test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pyaTS_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - пя: # Noun 'tree / (fin) puu' - partial paradigm /Type 1 ya→yi/ - pya
     пя+N+Sg+Nom: пя
     пя+N+Sg+Acc: пямʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen: пяʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat: пянʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc: пяхана
     пя+N+Sg+Abl: пяхад
     пя+N+Sg+Pros: пявна
     пя+N+Du+Nom: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom: пяˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc: пи
     пя+N+Pl+Gen: пиˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat: пяхаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc: пяхаˮна
     пя+N+Pl+Abl: пяхат
     пя+N+Pl+Pros: пяˮамна
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [пяв, пями]
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [пяв, пями]
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [пян, пяни]
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [пяхан, пяхани]
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [пяханан, пяханани]
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [пяхадан, пяхадани]
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [пявнан, пявнани]
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [пяхаюн, пяхаюни]
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [пяхаюн, пяхаюни]
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [пяхаюн, пяхаюни]
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [пин, пини]
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [пин, пини]
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [пиˮин, пиˮни]
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [пяхаˮн, пяхаˮни]
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [пяхаˮнан, пяхаˮнани]
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [пяхатан, пяхатани]
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [пяˮамнан, пяˮамнани]
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пяр
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: пямд
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: пянд
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: пяханд
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: пяхананд
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: пяхаданд
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: пявнанд
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: пяхаюд
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: пяхаюд
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: пяхают
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: пид
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: пид
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: пит
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: пяхат
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: пяхаˮнат
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: пяхатат
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: пяˮамнат
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пяда
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: пямда
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: пянда
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: пяханда
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: пяхананда
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: пяхаданда
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: пявнанда
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: пяхаюда
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: пяхаюда
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: пяхаюта
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: пида
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: пида
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: пита
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: пяхата
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: пяхаˮната
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: пяхатата
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: пяˮамната
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: пямиʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: пями
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: пямиʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: пями
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: пяниʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: пяни
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: пяханиʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: пяхани
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: пяхананиʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: пяханани
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: пяхаданиʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: пяхадани
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: пявнаниʼ
#     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: пявнани
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: пяхаюниʼ
#     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: пяхаюни
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: пяхаюниʼ
#     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: пяхаюни
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: пяхаюниʼ
#     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: пяхаюни
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: пиниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: пини
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: пиниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: пини
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: пиˮниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: пиˮни
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: пяхаˮниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: пяхаˮни
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: пяхаˮнаниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: пяхаˮнани
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: пяхатаниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: пяхатани
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: пяˮамнаниʼ
#     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: пяˮамнани
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: пяриʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: пямдиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: пяндиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: пяхандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: пяханандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: пяхадандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: пявнандиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: пяхаютиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: пидиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: пидиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: питиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: пяхатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: пяхаˮнатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: пяхататиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: пяˮамнатиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: пядиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: пямдиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: пяндиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: пяхандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: пяханандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: пяхадандиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: пявнандиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: пяхаютиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: пидиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: пидиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: питиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: пяхатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: пяхаˮнатиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: пяхататиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: пяˮамнатиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: пяваˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: пяваˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: пянаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: пяханаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: пяхананаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: пяхаданаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: пявнанаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: пинаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: пинаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: пиˮнаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: пяхаˮнаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: пяхаˮнанаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: пяхатанаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: пяˮамнанаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: пяраˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: пямдаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: пяндаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: пяхандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: пяханандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: пяхадандаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: пявнандаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: пяхаюдаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: пяхаюдаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: пяхаютаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: пидаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: пидаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: питаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: пяхатаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: пяхаˮнатаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: пяхататаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: пяˮамнатаˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: пядоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: пямдоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: пяндоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: пяхандоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: пяханандоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: пяхадандоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: пявнандоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: пяхаюдоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: пяхаюдоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: пяхаютоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: пидоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: пидоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: питоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: пяхатоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: пяхаˮнатоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: пяхататоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: пяˮамнатоʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Abs: пяд
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [пядав, пядув, пядами, пядми]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [пядав, пядув, пядами, пядми]
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [пядан, пядани, пядни]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: пядар
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: пядамд
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: пяданд
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [пядада, пядда]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: пядамда
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: пяданда
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [пядамиʼ, пядмиʼ]
#     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [пядами, пядми]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [пядамиʼ, пядмиʼ]
#     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [пядами, пядми]
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [пяданиʼ, пядниʼ]
#     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [пядани, пядни]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [пядариʼ, пядриʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: пядамдиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: пядандиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [пядадиʼ, пяддиʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: пядамдиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: пядандиʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [пядаваˮ, пядваˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [пядаваˮ, пядваˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [пяданаˮ, пяднаˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [пядараˮ, пядраˮ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: пядамдаˮ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: пядандаˮ
     пя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [пядадоʼ, пяддоʼ]
     пя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: пядамдоʼ
     пя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: пядандоʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: пядмʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: пян
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пя
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: пяниʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: пядиʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаʼ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: пяваˮ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: пядаˮ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пяˮ
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: пядамзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: пянась
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пясь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: пянинзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: пядинзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяханзь
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: пяваць
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: пядаць
     пя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пяць
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пяв
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пяр
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пяда
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пямиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пяриʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пядиʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пяваˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пяраˮ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пядоʼ
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пявась
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пярась
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пядась
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пяминзь
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пяринзь
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пядинзь
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пяваць
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пяраць
     пя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: пядонзь
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюн
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюд
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюда
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюниʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюдиʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюнаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюдаˮ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: пяхаюдоʼ
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюнась
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюдась
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюдась
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюнинзь
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюдинзь
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюдинзь
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюнаць
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюдаць
     пя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: пяхаюдонзь
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пин
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пид
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пида
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пиниʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пидиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пидиʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пинаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пидаˮ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пидоʼ
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пинась
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пидась
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пидась
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пининзь
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пидинзь
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пидинзь
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пинаць
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пидаць
     пя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пидонзь
     пя+N+Tra: пяӈэ
     пя+N+Car: пясиˮ
     пя+N+Equ: пядремʼ
     пя+N+Equ+Lat: пядревʼ
